Utah statutes.
76-10-520.   Number or mark assigned to pistol or revolver by Department of Public Safety.

The Department of Public Safety upon request may assign a distinguishing number or mark of identification to any pistol or revolver whenever it is without a manufacturer's number, or other mark of identification or whenever the manufacturer's number or other mark of identification or the distinguishing number or mark assigned by the Department of Public Safety has been destroyed or obliterated.



Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

